Utah statutes.
58-72-501.   Acupuncture licensee -- Restriction on titles used.

(1) (a)  A person practicing as a licensed acupuncturist may not display or in any way use any title, words, or insignia in conjunction with the person's name or practice except the words "licensed acupuncturist" or "L.Ac.".

(b)  When used in conjunction with the person's practice, the term "licensed acupuncturist" or "L.Ac." shall be displayed next to the name of the licensed acupuncturist.

(2) (a)  A licensed acupuncturist may not use the term "physician," "physician or surgeon," or "doctor" in conjunction with the acupuncturist's name or practice.

(b)  "Doctor of acupuncture" or "oriental medical doctor" may be used if the term is commensurate with the degree in acupuncture received by the practitioner.

(3)  Medical doctors or chiropractic physicians who choose to practice acupuncture shall represent themselves as medical doctors or chiropractic physicians practicing acupuncture and not as licensed acupuncturists.

